California, session 20252026, AB1634.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5004.3 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5004.3. (a) Subject to subdivision (d), the department shall establish the California Legacy License Plate Program and create and issue a series of specialized license plates known as California Legacy License Plates that replicate the look of California license plates from the state’s past. The design of the plates shall be identical, to the extent the department determines it to be reasonably feasible under current manufacturing processes, to a regular license plate, except as provided in subdivision (b).(b) The California Legacy License Plates shall consist of one or more of the following designs:(1) Yellow background with black lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1956 to 1962, inclusive.(2) Black background with yellow lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1965 to 1968, inclusive.(3) Blue background with yellow lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1969 to 1986, inclusive.(c) An applicant for the specialized license plates described in subdivision (a), who shall be the owner or lessee of the vehicle on which the plates will be displayed, may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department or request a combination of letters or numbers or both, subject to Section 5105.(d) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, renewal, retention, or transfer of the specialized license plates:(1) Fifty dollars ($50) for the original issuance of the plates.(2) Forty dollars ($40) for a renewal of registration with the plates.(3) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(4) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for each substitute replacement plate.(5) Thirty-eight dollars ($38), when the payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000 and the holder of the specialized license plates retains the plates. The fee shall be due at the expiration of the registration year of the vehicle to which the specialized license plates were assigned. This paragraph shall not apply when a plate character sequence is assigned by the department pursuant to subdivision (c).(e) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to the specialized license plates issued pursuant to this section.(f) The department shall not issue California Legacy License Plates for a vehicle that is exempt from the payment of registration fees pursuant to Section 9101 or 9103.(g) (1) The department shall not establish the California Legacy License Plate Program until the department has received not less than 7,500 paid applications for plates. The department shall collect and hold applications for the plates. The department shall not issue a specialized license plate until it has received not less than 7,500 paid applications for any one of the particular plates within the time period prescribed in this section.(2) The department shall have until January 1, 2015, to receive the required number of applications. If, after that date, 7,500 paid applications have not been received for any one of the three plates described in subdivision (b), the department shall immediately refund to all applicants all fees or deposits that have been collected.(h) (1) Upon a determination by the department that there are sufficient funds for the program, moneys shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the necessary administrative costs of establishing the California Legacy License Plate Program.(2) After deducting its administrative costs under this subdivision, the department shall deposit any additional revenue derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, retention, and substitution of the specialized license plates into the California Environmental License Plate Fund, for appropriation by the Legislature pursuant to existing law. For purposes of this paragraph, “administrative costs” includes the costs of including the California Legacy License Plates in materials that promote special license plates authorized by this chapter.(i) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 5004.3 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:5004.3. (a) Subject to subdivision (d), the department shall establish the California Legacy License Plate Program and create and issue a series of specialized license plates known as California Legacy License Plates that replicate the look of California license plates from the state’s past. The design of the plates shall be identical, to the extent the department determines it to be reasonably feasible under current manufacturing processes, to a regular license plate, except as provided in subdivision (b).(b) The California Legacy License Plates shall consist of one or more of the following designs:(1) Yellow background with black lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1956 to 1962, inclusive.(2) Black background with yellow lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1965 to 1968, inclusive.(3) Blue background with yellow lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1969 to 1986, inclusive.(c) An applicant for the specialized license plates described in subdivision (a), who shall be the owner or lessee of the vehicle on which the plates will be displayed, may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department or request a combination of letters or numbers or both, subject to Section 5105.(d) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, renewal, retention, or transfer of the specialized license plates:(1) Fifty dollars ($50) for the original issuance of the plates.(2) Forty dollars ($40) for a renewal of registration with the plates.(3) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(4) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for each substitute replacement plate.(5) Thirty-eight dollars ($38), when the payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000 and the holder of the specialized license plates retains the plates. The fee shall be due at the expiration of the registration year of the vehicle to which the specialized license plates were assigned. This paragraph shall not apply when a plate character sequence is assigned by the department pursuant to subdivision (c).(e) Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to the specialized license plates issued pursuant to this section.(f) The department shall not issue California Legacy License Plates for a vehicle that is exempt from the payment of registration fees pursuant to Section 9101 or 9103.(g) (1) The department shall not establish the California Legacy License Plate Program until the department has received not less than 7,500 paid applications for plates. The department shall collect and hold applications for the plates. The department shall not issue a specialized license plate until it has received not less than 7,500 paid applications for any one of the particular plates within the time period prescribed in this section.(2) The department shall have until January 1, 2015, to receive the required number of applications. If, after that date, 7,500 paid applications have not been received for any one of the three plates described in subdivision (b), the department shall immediately refund to all applicants all fees or deposits that have been collected.(h) (1) Upon a determination by the department that there are sufficient funds for the program, moneys shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the necessary administrative costs of establishing the California Legacy License Plate Program.(2) After deducting its administrative costs under this subdivision, the department shall deposit any additional revenue derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, retention, and substitution of the specialized license plates into the California Environmental License Plate Fund, for appropriation by the Legislature pursuant to existing law. For purposes of this paragraph, “administrative costs” includes the costs of including the California Legacy License Plates in materials that promote special license plates authorized by this chapter.(i) (1) An applicant for a specialized license plate described in subdivision (a) may apply to use one of the four symbols allowed in the alphanumeric sequence from the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plate, pursuant to Section 5072, to personalize their legacy plate.(2) The applicant shall pay a fifty dollar ($50) fee for the specialized license plate in addition to the fees described in subdivision (d).(3) Fees generated pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be deposited equally into the Child Health and Safety Fund created pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the California Environmental License Plate Fund.(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the specialized license plate pursuant to this subdivision be considered a specialized license plate within the California Legacy License Plate Program pursuant to this section. The specialized license plate pursuant to this subdivision does not constitute the creation of a new type of specialized license plate.(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.SEC. 3. Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5072. (a) Any person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates, and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of the regular license plates. The “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” plates shall be distinct from other existing license plates by the inclusion of a well within the portion of the license plate that has the alpha-numeric sequence. The well may be placed in any position within that portion of the license plate. A heart shape, a five-pointed star, a hand shape, a plus-sign shape, shall be imprinted within the well itself. However, for purposes of processing the alpha-numeric sequence, the symbol within the well shall be read as a blank within the alpha-numeric sequence. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall cooperate with representatives of the California Highway Patrol and the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority to design the final shape and dimension of the symbols for these license plates.(b) An applicant for a license plate described in subdivision (a) may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department that includes one of the four symbols or request a specialized license plate character sequence determined by the applicant that includes one of the four symbols, in accordance with instructions which shall be provided by the department.(c) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of registration, the following “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plate fees shall be paid:(1) Notwithstanding Section 5106, for those specialized license plates whose character sequence is determined by the license owner or applicant:(A) Fifty dollars ($50) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B) Forty dollars ($40) for each renewal of registration which includes the continued display of the plates.(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(2) For those specialized license plates whose character sequence is assigned by the department:(A) Twenty dollars ($20) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B) The legally allowed fee for renewal plus fifteen dollars ($15) for each renewal of registration, which includes the continued display of the plates.(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D) Twenty dollars ($20) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(d) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the plates.(e) The revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and local law enforcement for developing and administering this license plate program pursuant to this section, shall be deposited in the Child Health and Safety Fund, created pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and, when appropriated by the Legislature shall be available for the purposes specified in that chapter.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the additional special fees specified in subdivision (e) are not used to replace existing appropriation levels in the 1991–92 Budget Act.(g) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 5072 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:5072. (a) Any person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates, and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of the regular license plates. The “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” plates shall be distinct from other existing license plates by the inclusion of a well within the portion of the license plate that has the alpha-numeric sequence. The well may be placed in any position within that portion of the license plate. A heart shape, a five-pointed star, a hand shape, a plus-sign shape, shall be imprinted within the well itself. However, for purposes of processing the alpha-numeric sequence, the symbol within the well shall be read as a blank within the alpha-numeric sequence. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall cooperate with representatives of the California Highway Patrol and the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority to design the final shape and dimension of the symbols for these license plates.(b) An applicant for a license plate described in subdivision (a) may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department that includes one of the four symbols or request a specialized license plate character sequence determined by the applicant that includes one of the four symbols, in accordance with instructions which shall be provided by the department.(c) In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of registration, the following “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plate fees shall be paid:(1) Notwithstanding Section 5106, for those specialized license plates whose character sequence is determined by the license owner or applicant:(A) Ninety dollars ($90) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B) Eighty dollars ($80) for each renewal of registration which includes the continued display of the plates.(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D) Thirty-five dollars ($35) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(2) For those specialized license plates whose character sequence is assigned by the department:(A) Forty dollars ($40) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B) The legally allowed fee for renewal plus thirty dollars ($30) for each renewal of registration, which includes the continued display of the plates.(C) Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D) Twenty dollars ($20) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(d) When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the plates.(e) The revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and local law enforcement for developing and administering this license plate program pursuant to this section, shall be deposited in the Child Health and Safety Fund, created pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and, when appropriated by the Legislature shall be available for the purposes specified in that chapter.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that the additional special fees specified in subdivision (e) are not used to replace existing appropriation levels in the 1991–92 Budget Act.(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.SEC. 5. Section 18285 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18285. (a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Child Health and Safety Fund for the purposes specified in this section.(b) Moneys for this fund shall be derived from the license plate program provided for pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code and from civil penalties on child daycare facility providers.(c) Moneys in the fund shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes specified in subdivisions (d), (e), and (f).(d) Fifty percent of moneys derived from the license plate program pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code shall be available, upon appropriation, to the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of administering provisions of Sections 1596.816, 1596.87, 1596.872b, 1596.893b 1596.895, 1596.95, 1597.091, 1597.54, 1597.541, 1597.542, 1597.55b and 1597.62 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, an additional five hundred one thousand dollars ($501,000), in excess of the 50 percent derived from the license plate program, also shall be made available for these purposes. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate these special funds according to the following priorities:(1) Site visits performed pursuant to Sections 1597.091 and 1597.55b of the Health and Safety Code.(2) The monitoring responsibility of the childcare advocate program.(3) Training for investigative and licensing field staff.(4) Other aspects of the childcare advocate program performed pursuant to Section 1596.872b of the Health and Safety Code.(5) The salary of the chief of the childcare licensing branch.In order to implement the list of priorities set forth in this subdivision, and to complete implementation of subdivision (a) of Section 1596.816 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may, as necessary, fund appropriate administrative support costs.(e) The balance of funds remaining after the appropriations specified in subdivision (d) derived from the license plate program pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code shall be available, upon appropriation, for programs that address any of the following child health and safety concerns and that are either to be carried out within a two-year period or whose implementation is dependent upon one-time initial funding:(1) Child abuse prevention, except that not more than 25 percent of the moneys in this fund shall be used for this purpose. Ninety percent of the 25 percent shall be deposited in the county children’s trust fund, established pursuant to Section 18966 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the support of child abuse prevention services in the community, and 10 percent of the 25 percent shall be deposited in the State Children’s Trust Fund, established pursuant to Section 18969, for public education, training, and technical assistance.(2) Vehicular safety, including restraint, warnings, and education programs.(3) Drowning prevention.(4) Playground safety standards.(5) Pedestrian Safety.(6) Bicycle safety.(7) Gun safety.(8) Fire safety.(9) Poison control and safety.(10) In-home safety.(11) Childhood poisoning, including from prescription medications, lead, and other toxic substances.(12) Sleep suffocation and sudden infant death syndrome.(13) Children left in parked cars and children run over by cars moving forward or backward.(14) Sports-related concussions, heat stroke, and spinal injury safety.(f) Moneys derived from civil penalties imposed on daycare facility providers shall be made available, upon appropriation, to the State Department of Social Services exclusively for the technical assistance, orientation, training, and education of child daycare facility providers.(g) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 18285 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18285. (a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Child Health and Safety Fund for the purposes specified in this section.(b) Moneys for this fund shall be derived from both of the following:(1) The specialty license plate program pursuant to Sections 5004.3 and 5072 of the Vehicle Code.(2) Civil penalties on child daycare facility providers.(c) (1) Moneys allocated to the Child Health and Safety Fund from the specialty license plate program pursuant to Sections 5004.3 and 5072 of the Vehicle Code shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes specified in subdivision (d).(2) Moneys derived from civil penalties imposed on child daycare facility providers shall be made available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Department of Social Services exclusively for the technical assistance, orientation, training, and education of child daycare facility providers.(d) Moneys described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be allocated as follows:(1) Twenty-five percent of the funds shall be available for the State Department of Social Services childcare licensing branch for the administration and salary of the chief of the childcare licensing branch as laid out in this section, but not less than the allocation appropriated by the Legislature during the 2024–25 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter as appropriated by the Legislature, including any cost of living adjustments allocated by the Legislature, to support the administrative provisions in this section allocated to the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of administering Sections 1596.816, 1596.87, 1596.872b, 1596.893b, 1596.895, 1596.95, 1597.091, 1597.54, 1597.541, 1597.542, 1597.55b, and 1597.62 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, an additional five hundred one thousand dollars ($501,000), in excess of the moneys allocated to the State Department of Social Services childcare licensing administration derived from the specialty license plate program shall be made available for these purposes. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate these special funds according to the following priorities:(A) Site visits performed pursuant to Sections 1597.091 and 1597.55b of the Health and Safety Code.(B) The monitoring responsibility of the childcare advocate program.(C) Training for investigative and licensing field staff.(D) Other aspects of the childcare advocate program performed pursuant to Section 1596.872b of the Health and Safety Code.(E) The salary of the chief of the childcare licensing branch. In order to implement the list of priorities set forth in this paragraph, and to complete implementation of subdivision (a) of Section 1596.816 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may, as necessary, fund appropriate administrative support costs.(2) Twenty-two and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated to the 58 First 5 county commissions on a per capita basis, as follows:(A) One-half of the funds shall be distributed to the 58 First 5 county commissions in counties with a population greater than 500,000, who shall receive equal amounts of the funds.(B) The other one-half of the funds shall be distributed to the 58 First 5 county commissions in counties with a population less than or equal to 500,000, who shall receive equal amounts of the funds.(C) Funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be used for one or both of the following:(i) Recruiting new childcare providers.(ii) Supporting education and training for new childcare providers or continuing education for existing childcare providers, including licensed and exempt providers.(3) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated to the Emergency Medical Services Authority having oversight of new and continuing childcare provider health and safety education and training program curriculum and first responder programs. The funds shall be used for the following purposes:(A) New childcare provider health and safety education and training programs, including all of the following:(i) Review and approval of childcare provider health and safety education and training as established in Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 100000.01) of Division 9 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(ii) Onsite reviews of approved education and training programs to ensure approved curriculum is adhered to and to observe the quality of the education and training program delivery.(iii) Coordination with relevant bodies involved in improving access, quality, and affordability of childcare, including, but not limited to, childcare provider recruitment and planning agencies, academic institutions, and childcare and child development councils.(B) Support of the California Emergency Medical Services for Children Act of 1996, pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1799.202) of Division 2.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(4) Twenty percent of the funds shall be distributed as follows to each of the state’s county First 5 county commissions created pursuant to Section 130140.1 of the Health and Safety Code that elect to receive the funds based on the following allocation formula. The choice to elect to receive the funds is based on an annual survey of all 58 county commissions conducted by the nonprofit staffing the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project, known as the Safer California Project, and reported to the appropriate state agency charged with the actual allocation of the funds to the First 5 county commissions.(A) County commissions in counties with populations over 100,000 shall receive equal shares of 16 percent of the total funds described in this subdivision for distribution to county commissions opting into receiving these funds based on the survey completed pursuant to this paragraph.(B) County commissions in counties with populations equal to or under 100,000 shall receive equal shares of the 4 percent of the total funds described in this subdivision for distribution to county commissions opting into receiving these funds based on the survey completed pursuant to this paragraph.(C) The county commissions receiving these funds shall only utilize the funds for programs that address the categories described in subparagraph (E) that are either to be carried out within a two-year period or whose implementation is dependent upon one-time initial funding.(D) Each county commission electing to receive this funding shall use the funds for any of the following:(i) To support local programs that further unintentional injury prevention in one or any of the unintentional injury categories described in subparagraph (E).(ii) To supplement and not supplant existing funding supporting programs furthering child health and safety and aligned with childhood unintentional injury prevention.(iii) To promote and practice those evidence-based best prevention practices addressing childhood unintentional injury provided or recommended by the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project.(iv) At the county commission’s discretion, to participate with the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project pursuant to the project’s responsibilities in paragraph (5).(v) Where appropriate, to collaborate with regional or local childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions or programs, including childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions or programs in tribal lands.(vi) The commissions may use the funds described in this paragraph to participate at the annual California Children and Families Commission conference but only if that conference has programs or tracks of activities focused on childhood unintentional injury prevention and participate in the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(E) The funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall only be used to address the following childhood unintentional injury issues:(i) Vehicular safety, including restraint, warnings, and education programs.(ii) Drowning prevention.(iii) Playground safety standards.(iv) Pedestrian safety.(v) Bicycle safety.(vi) Gun safety.(vii) Home fire and burn safety and family disaster planning.(viii) Poison control safety.(ix) In-home safety.(x) Childhood poisoning, including from prescription medications, lead, and other toxic substances.(xi) Sleep suffocation and sudden infant death syndrome.(xii) Children left in parked cars and children run over by cars moving forward or backward.(xiii) Sports-related concussions, heat stroke, cardiac arrest, and spinal injury safety.(xiv) Unintentional injuries associated with mental health.(5) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be distributed to the State Department of Public Health’s branch responsible for childhood injury prevention for three purposes:(A) Provide technical assistance and distribution of evidence-based prevention practices information to childhood injury prevention programs engaged in childhood injury prevention issue categories described in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (4).(B) Provide oversight and accountability of programs conducted pursuant to paragraph (6) as reported annually to the State Department of Public Health by the organization providing administration and staffing for the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project pursuant to paragraph (6).(C) Provide planning, financial, and attendance support to the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(6) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated to the nonprofit organization providing administration and staffing to the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project, known as the Safer California Project, with responsibility to do all of the following:(A) Support statewide networking of local childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions and programs.(B) Support evidence-based best practice technical assistance and training programs for childhood unintentional injury prevention, including sharing successful local models of unintentional injury prevention, for local prevention coalitions, programs, and county commissions as described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4).(C) Support the updating of childhood unintentional injury prevention strategic planning identification of the top 10 action priorities necessary to support the state ending unintentional injury as the leading cause of death and hospitalizations of California’s children and youth through 19 years of age.(D) Plan activities, administration, and staff support for the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(E) Support public policy to prevent childhood unintentional injury.(F) Conduct an annual survey of the county commissions created through Section 130140.1 of the Health and Safety Code to determine which of the county commissions elect to receive this funding, and to transmit that survey result to the state for distribution of the funding to the county commissions.(G) Provide the State Department of Public Health childhood injury prevention branch with an annual report on actions carried out pursuant to this subparagraph.(7) Twenty-two and one-half percent for child abuse prevention shall be deposited in the 58 county children’s trust fund, established pursuant to Section 18966 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the support of child abuse prevention services in the community.(8) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be deposited in the State Children’s Trust Fund, established pursuant to Section 18969, for public education, training, and technical assistance.(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.SEC. 6.5. Section 18285 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18285. (a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Child Health and Safety Fund for the purposes specified in this section.(b) Moneys for this fund shall be derived from both of the following:(1) The specialty license plate program pursuant to Sections 5004.3 and 5072 of the Vehicle Code.(2) Civil penalties on child daycare facility providers.(c) (1) Moneys allocated to the Child Health and Safety Fund from the specialty license plate program pursuant to Sections 5004.3 and 5072 of the Vehicle Code shall be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes specified in subdivision (d).(2) Moneys derived from civil penalties imposed on child daycare facility providers shall be made available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Department of Social Services exclusively for the technical assistance, orientation, training, and education of child daycare facility providers.(d) Moneys described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall be allocated as follows:(1) Twenty-five percent of the funds shall be available for the State Department of Social Services childcare licensing branch for the administration and salary of the chief of the childcare licensing branch as laid out in this section, but not less than the allocation appropriated by the Legislature during the 2024–25 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter as appropriated by the Legislature, including any cost of living adjustments allocated by the Legislature, to support the administrative provisions in this section allocated to the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of administering Sections 1596.816, 1596.87, 1596.872b, 1596.893b, 1596.895, 1596.95, 1597.091, 1597.54, 1597.541, 1597.542, 1597.55b, and 1597.62 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, an additional five hundred one thousand dollars ($501,000), in excess of the moneys allocated to the State Department of Social Services childcare licensing administration derived from the specialty license plate program shall be made available for these purposes. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate these special funds according to the following priorities:(A) Site visits performed pursuant to Sections 1597.091 and 1597.55b of the Health and Safety Code.(B) The monitoring responsibility of the childcare advocate program.(C) Training for investigative and licensing field staff.(D) Other aspects of the childcare advocate program performed pursuant to Section 1596.872b of the Health and Safety Code.(E) The salary of the chief of the childcare licensing branch. In order to implement the list of priorities set forth in this paragraph, and to complete implementation of subdivision (a) of Section 1596.816 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may, as necessary, fund appropriate administrative support costs.(2) Twenty-two and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated to the 58 First 5 county commissions on a per capita basis, as follows:(A) One-half of the funds shall be distributed to the 58 First 5 county commissions in counties with a population greater than 500,000, who shall receive equal amounts of the funds.(B) The other one-half of the funds shall be distributed to the 58 First 5 county commissions in counties with a population less than or equal to 500,000, who shall receive equal amounts of the funds.(C) Funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be used for one or both of the following:(i) Recruiting new childcare providers.(ii) Supporting education and training for new childcare providers or continuing education for existing childcare providers, including licensed and exempt providers.(3) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated to the Emergency Medical Services Authority having oversight of new and continuing childcare provider health and safety education and training program curriculum and first responder programs. The funds shall be used for the following purposes:(A) New childcare provider health and safety education and training programs, including all of the following:(i) Review and approval of childcare provider health and safety education and training as established in Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 100000.01) of Division 9 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(ii) Onsite reviews of approved education and training programs to ensure approved curriculum is adhered to and to observe the quality of the education and training program delivery.(iii) Coordination with relevant bodies involved in improving access, quality, and affordability of childcare, including, but not limited to, childcare provider recruitment and planning agencies, academic institutions, and childcare and child development councils.(B) Support of the California Emergency Medical Services for Children Act of 1996, pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1799.202) of Division 2.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(C) Gathering and reporting data relating to the lifeguard workforce pursuant to Section 1797.162 of the Health and Safety Code.(4) Twenty percent of the funds shall be distributed as follows to each of the state’s county First 5 county commissions created pursuant to Section 130140.1 of the Health and Safety Code that elect to receive the funds based on the following allocation formula. The choice to elect to receive the funds is based on an annual survey of all 58 county commissions conducted by the nonprofit staffing the Safer California Project and reported to the appropriate state agency charged with the actual allocation of the funds to the First 5 county commissions.(A) County commissions in counties with populations over 100,000 shall receive equal shares of 16 percent of the total funds described in this subdivision for distribution to county commissions opting into receiving these funds based on the survey completed pursuant to this paragraph.(B) County commissions in counties with populations equal to or under 100,000 shall receive equal shares of the 4 percent of the total funds described in this subdivision for distribution to county commissions opting into receiving these funds based on the survey completed pursuant to this paragraph.(C) The county commissions receiving these funds shall only utilize the funds for programs that address the categories described in subparagraph (E) that are either to be carried out within a two-year period or whose implementation is dependent upon one-time initial funding.(D) Each county commission electing to receive this funding shall use the funds for any of the following:(i) To support local programs that further unintentional injury prevention in one or any of the unintentional injury categories described in subparagraph (E).(ii) To supplement and not supplant existing funding supporting programs furthering child health and safety and aligned with childhood unintentional injury prevention.(iii) To promote and practice those evidence-based best prevention practices addressing childhood unintentional injury provided or recommended by the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project.(iv) At the county commission’s discretion, to participate with the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project pursuant to the project’s responsibilities in paragraph (5).(v) Where appropriate, to collaborate with regional or local childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions or programs, including childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions or programs in tribal lands.(vi) The commissions may use the funds described in this paragraph to participate at the annual California Children and Families Commission conference but only if that conference has programs or tracks of activities focused on childhood unintentional injury prevention and participate in the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(E) The funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall only be used to address the following childhood unintentional injury issues:(i) Vehicular safety, including restraint, warnings, and education programs.(ii) Drowning prevention.(iii) Playground safety standards.(iv) Pedestrian safety.(v) Bicycle safety.(vi) Gun safety.(vii) Home fire and burn safety and family disaster planning.(viii) Poison control safety.(ix) In-home safety.(x) Childhood poisoning, including from prescription medications, lead, and other toxic substances.(xi) Sleep suffocation and sudden infant death syndrome.(xii) Children left in parked cars and children run over by cars moving forward or backward.(xiii) Sports-related concussions, heat stroke, cardiac arrest, and spinal injury safety.(xiv) Unintentional injuries associated with mental health.(5) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be distributed to the State Department of Public Health’s branch responsible for childhood injury prevention for three purposes:(A) Provide technical assistance and distribution of evidence-based prevention practices information to childhood injury prevention programs engaged in childhood injury prevention issue categories described in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (4).(B) Provide oversight and accountability of programs conducted pursuant to paragraph (6) as reported annually to the State Department of Public Health by the organization providing administration and staffing for the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project pursuant to paragraph (6).(C) Provide planning, financial, and attendance support to the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(6) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated to the nonprofit organization providing administration and staffing to the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project, known as the Safer California Project, with responsibility to do all of the following:(A) Support statewide networking of local childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions and programs.(B) Support evidence-based, best practice technical assistance and training programs for childhood unintentional injury prevention, including sharing successful local models of unintentional injury prevention, for local prevention coalitions, programs, and county commissions as described in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4).(C) Support the updating of childhood unintentional injury prevention strategic planning identification of the top 10 action priorities necessary to support the state ending unintentional injury as the leading cause of death and hospitalizations of California’s children and youth through 19 years of age.(D) Planning activities, administration, and staff support for the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(E) Support public policy to prevent childhood unintentional injury.(F) Conduct an annual survey of the county commissions created through Section 130140.1 of the Health and Safety Code to determine which of the county commissions elect to receive this funding, and to transmit that survey result to the state for distribution of the funding to the county commissions.(G) Provide the State Department of Public Health childhood injury prevention branch with an annual report on actions carried out pursuant to this subparagraph.(7) Twenty-two and one-half percent for child abuse prevention shall be deposited in the 58 county children’s trust fund, established pursuant to Section 18966 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the support of child abuse prevention services in the community.(8) Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be deposited in the State Children’s Trust Fund, established pursuant to Section 18969, for public education, training, and technical assistance.(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.SEC. 7. Section 6.5 of this bill, adding Section 18285 to the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall only become operative if Assembly Bill 1639 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is enacted and becomes effective on or before January 1, 2027, and adds Section 1797.162 to the Health and Safety Code, in which case Section 6 of this bill shall not become operative.SECTION 1.Section 5004.3 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5004.3.(a)Subject to subdivision (d), the department shall establish the California Legacy License Plate Program and create and issue a series of specialized license plates known as California Legacy License Plates that replicate the look of California license plates from the state’s past. The design of the plates shall be identical, to the extent the department determines it to be reasonably feasible under current manufacturing processes, to a regular license plate, except as provided in subdivision (b).(b)The California Legacy License Plates shall consist of one or more of the following designs:(1)Yellow background with black lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1956 to 1962, inclusive.(2)Black background with yellow lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1965 to 1968, inclusive.(3)Blue background with yellow lettering per the appearance of California license plates issued by the department from 1969 to 1986, inclusive.(c)An applicant for the specialized license plates described in subdivision (a), who shall be the owner or lessee of the vehicle on which the plates will be displayed, may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department or request a combination of letters or numbers or both, subject to Section 5105.(d)In addition to the regular fees for an original registration or renewal of registration, the following additional fees shall be paid for the issuance, renewal, retention, or transfer of the specialized license plates:(1)Fifty dollars ($50) for the original issuance of the plates.(2)Forty dollars ($40) for a renewal of registration with the plates.(3)Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(4)Thirty-five dollars ($35) for each substitute replacement plate.(5)Thirty-eight dollars ($38), when the payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000 and the holder of the specialized license plates retains the plates. The fee shall be due at the expiration of the registration year of the vehicle to which the specialized license plates were assigned. This paragraph shall not apply when a plate character sequence is assigned by the department pursuant to subdivision (c).(e)Sections 5106 and 5108 do not apply to the specialized license plates issued pursuant to this section.(f)The department shall not issue California Legacy License Plates for a vehicle that is exempt from the payment of registration fees pursuant to Section 9101 or 9103.(g)(1)The department shall not establish the California Legacy License Plate Program until the department has received not less than 7,500 paid applications for plates. The department shall collect and hold applications for the plates. The department shall not issue a specialized license plate until it has received not less than 7,500 paid applications for any one of the particular plates within the time period prescribed in this section.(2)The department shall have until January 1, 2015, to receive the required number of applications. If, after that date, 7,500 paid applications have not been received for any one of the three plates described in subdivision (b), the department shall immediately refund to all applicants all fees or deposits that have been collected.(h)(1)Upon a determination by the department that there are sufficient funds for the program, moneys shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the necessary administrative costs of establishing the California Legacy License Plate Program.(2)After deducting its administrative costs under this subdivision, the department shall deposit any additional revenue derived from the issuance, renewal, transfer, retention, and substitution of the specialized license plates into the California Environmental License Plate Fund, for appropriation by the Legislature pursuant to existing law. For purposes of this paragraph, “administrative costs” includes the costs of including the California Legacy License Plates in materials that promote special license plates authorized by this chapter.(i)(1)An applicant for a specialized license plate described in subdivision (a) may apply to use one of the four symbols allowed in the alphanumeric sequence from the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” plate, pursuant to Section 5072, to personalize their legacy plate.(2)The applicant shall pay a fifty dollar ($50) fee for the specialized license plate in addition to the fees described in subdivision (d).(3)Fees generated pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be deposited equally into the Child Health and Safety Fund created pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and the California Environmental License Plate Fund.SEC. 2.Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:5072.(a)Any person described in Section 5101 may also apply for a set of “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates, and the department shall issue those special license plates in lieu of the regular license plates. The “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” plates shall be distinct from other existing license plates by the inclusion of a well within the portion of the license plate that has the alpha-numeric sequence. The well may be placed in any position within that portion of the license plate. A heart shape, a five-pointed star, a hand shape, a plus-sign shape, shall be imprinted within the well itself. However, for purposes of processing the alpha-numeric sequence, the symbol within the well shall be read as a blank within the alpha-numeric sequence. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall cooperate with representatives of the California Highway Patrol and the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority to design the final shape and dimension of the symbols for these license plates.(b)An applicant for a license plate described in subdivision (a) may choose to either accept a license plate character sequence assigned by the department that includes one of the four symbols or request a specialized license plate character sequence determined by the applicant that includes one of the four symbols, in accordance with instructions which shall be provided by the department.(c)In addition to the regular fees for an original registration, a renewal of registration, or a transfer of registration, the following “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plate fees shall be paid:(1)Notwithstanding Section 5106, for those specialized license plates whose character sequence is determined by the license owner or applicant:(A) Ninety dollars ($90) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B) Eighty dollars ($80) for each renewal of registration which includes the continued display of the plates.(C)Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D)Thirty-five dollars ($35) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(2)For those specialized license plates whose character sequence is assigned by the department:(A) Forty dollars ($40) for the initial issuance of the plates. These plates shall be permanent and shall not be required to be replaced.(B)The legally allowed fee for renewal plus thirty dollars ($30) for each renewal of registration, which includes the continued display of the plates.(C)Fifteen dollars ($15) for transfer of the plates to another vehicle.(D)Twenty dollars ($20) for replacement plates, if the plates become damaged or unserviceable.(d)When payment of renewal fees is not required as specified in Section 4000, or when the person determines to retain the “Have a Heart, Be a Star, Help Our Kids” license plates upon sale, trade, or other release of the vehicle upon which the plates have been displayed, the person shall notify the department and the person may retain the plates.(e)The revenue derived from the additional special fees provided in this section, less costs incurred by the department, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, and local law enforcement for developing and administering this license plate program pursuant to this section, shall be deposited in the Child Health and Safety Fund, created pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 18285) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and, when appropriated by the Legislature shall be available for the purposes specified in that chapter.(f)It is the intent of the Legislature that the additional special fees specified in subdivision (e) are not used to replace existing appropriation levels in the 1991–92 Budget Act.SEC. 3.Section 18285 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18285.(a)There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Child Health and Safety Fund for the purposes specified in this section.(b)Moneys for this fund shall be derived from the license plate program provided for pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code and from civil penalties on child daycare facility providers.(c)Moneys allocated to the Child Health and Safety Fund from the specialty vehicle license plate program pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code shall be expended, upon appropriation, for the purposes specified in subdivisions (d) and (e).(d)(1)Fifty percent of the moneys derived from the license plate program pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code before July 1, 2027, shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to state and local childcare provider licensure, oversight, recruitment, training, and development.(2)Up to 50 percent of the allocation pursuant to paragraph (1), but not less than the allocation appropriated by the Legislature during the 2024–25 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter as appropriated by the Legislature, including any cost of living adjustments (COLA) allocated by the Legislature, to support the administrative provisions in paragraph (1) shall be allocated to the State Department of Social Services for the purpose of administering Sections 1596.816, 1596.87, 1596.872b, 1596.893b, 1596.895, 1596.95, 1597.091, 1597.54, 1597.541, 1597.542, 1597.55b, and 1597.62 of the Health and Safety Code. Upon appropriation by the Legislature, an additional five hundred one thousand dollars ($501,000), in excess of the 50 percent derived from the license plate program, shall be made available for these purposes. The State Department of Social Services shall allocate these special funds according to the following priorities:(A)Site visits performed pursuant to Sections 1597.091 and 1597.55b of the Health and Safety Code.(B)The monitoring responsibility of the childcare advocate program.(C)Training for investigative and licensing field staff.(D)Other aspects of the childcare advocate program performed pursuant to Section 1596.872b of the Health and Safety Code.(E)The salary of the chief of the childcare licensing branch. In order to implement the list of priorities set forth in this paragraph, and to complete implementation of subdivision (a) of Section 1596.816 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Department of Social Services may, as necessary, fund appropriate administrative support costs.(3)The remainder of the funds derived from the license plate program, following allocation pursuant to paragraph (2), shall be allocated to childcare safety and health as follows:(A)Ninety percent of the funds or an adjusted amount based on the initial distribution in paragraph (2) shall be allocated to the 58 First 5 county commissions on a per-capita basis, as follows:(i)Fifty percent of the funds described in subparagraph (A) shall be distributed to the 58 First 5 county commissions in counties with a population greater than 500,000 shall receive equal amounts of the funds.(ii)Fifty percent of the funds described in subparagraph (A) shall be distributed to the 58 First 5 county commissions in counties with a population less than or equal to 500,000, who shall receive equal amounts of the funds.(B)Funds allocated pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be used for one or both of the following:(i)Recruiting new childcare providers.(ii)Supporting education and training for new childcare providers or continuing education for existing childcare providers, including licensed and exempt providers.(C)Ten percent of the funds described in this paragraph shall be allocated to the state agency having oversight of new and continuing childcare provider health and safety education and training program curriculum and shall be used for the following purposes:(i)Review and approval of childcare provider health and safety education and training as established in Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 100000.1) of Division 9 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(ii)Onsite reviews of approved education and training programs to ensure approved curriculum is adhered to and to observe the quality of the education and training program delivery.(iii)Coordination with relevant bodies involved in improving access, quality, and affordability of childcare, including, but not limited to, childcare provider recruitment and planning agencies, academic institutions, and childcare and child development councils.(e)Fifty percent of the moneys derived from the license plate program pursuant to Section 5072 of the Vehicle Code on or after July 1, 2027, shall be available, upon appropriation, for programs that address any of the following child health and safety concerns and that are either to be carried out within a two-year period or whose implementation is dependent upon one-time initial funding:(1)Fifty percent of the moneys identified in subdivision (e) shall be distributed in the following three ways to support childhood injury prevention:(A)Eighty percent of the funds shall be distributed to each of the state’s county First 5 county commissions created pursuant to Section 130140.1 of the Health and Safety Code that elect to receive the funds based on the following allocation formula. The choice to elect to receive the funds is based on an annual survey of all 58 county commissions conducted by the nonprofit staffing the Safer California Project and reported to the appropriate state agency charged with the actual allocation of the funds to the First 5 county commissions.(i)County commissions in counties with populations over 100,000 shall receive equal shares of 80 percent of the available funds for distribution to county commissions opting into receiving these funds based on the survey completed pursuant to this subparagraph.(ii)County commissions in counties with populations equal to or under 100,000 shall receive equal shares of 20 percent of the available funds for distribution to county commissions opting into receiving these funds based on the survey completed pursuant to this subparagraph.(iii)The county commissions receiving these funds shall only utilize the funds for programs that address the categories described in clause (v) that are either to be carried out within a two-year period or whose implementation is dependent upon one-time initial funding.(iv)Each county commission electing to receive this funding shall use the funds for any of the following:(I)To support local programs that further unintentional injury prevention in one or any of the unintentional injury categories described in clause (v).(II)To supplement and not supplant existing funding supporting programs furthering child health and safety and aligned with childhood unintentional injury prevention.(III)To promote and practice those evidence-based best prevention practices addressing childhood unintentional injury provided or recommended by the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan.(IV)At the county commission’s discretion, to participate with the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project pursuant to the project’s responsibilities in subparagraph (C).(V)Where appropriate, to collaborate with regional or local childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions or programs, including childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions or programs in tribal lands.(VI)The commissions may use the funds described in this paragraph to participate at the annual California Children and Families Commission conference but only if that conference has programs or tracks of activities focused on childhood unintentional injury prevention and participate in the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(v)The funds allocated pursuant to this subparagraph shall only be used to address the following childhood unintentional injury issues:(I)Vehicular safety, including restraint, warnings, and education programs.(II)Drowning prevention.(III)Playground safety standards.(IV)Pedestrian safety.(V)Bicycle safety.(VI)Gun safety.(VII)Home fire and burn safety and family disaster planning.(VIII)Poison control safety.(IX)In-home safety.(X)Childhood poisoning, including from prescription medications, lead, and other toxic substances.(XI)Sleep suffocation and sudden infant death syndrome.(XII)Children left in parked cars and children run over by cars moving forward or backward.(XIII)Sports-related concussions, heat stroke, cardiac arrest, and spinal injury safety.(XIV)Unintentional injuries associated with mental health.(B)Ten percent of the funds identified in paragraph (1) shall be distributed to the State Department of Public Health’s branch responsible for childhood injury prevention for three purposes:(i)Provide technical assistance and distribution of evidence-based prevention practices information to childhood injury prevention programs engaged in childhood injury prevention issue categories described in clause (v) of subparagraph (A).(ii)Provide oversight and accountability of programs conducted pursuant to subparagraph (C) as reported annually to the State Department of Public Health by the organization providing administration and staffing for the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project pursuant to subparagraph (C).(iii)Provide planning, financial, and attendance support to the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(C)Ten percent of the funds identified in paragraph (1) shall be allocated to the nonprofit organization providing administration and staffing to the California Unintentional Injury Prevention Strategic Plan Project, known as the Safer California Project, with responsibility to:(i)Support statewide networking of local childhood unintentional injury prevention coalitions and programs.(ii)Support evidence-based, best practice technical assistance and training programs for childhood unintentional injury prevention, including sharing successful local models of unintentional injury prevention, for local prevention coalitions, programs, and county commissions as described in clause (v) of subparagraph (A).(iii)Support the updating of childhood unintentional injury prevention strategic planning identification of the top 10 action priorities necessary to support the state ending unintentional injury as the leading cause of death and hospitalizations of California’s children and youth through 19 years of age.(iv)Planning activities, administration, and staff support for the biennial Safer California Unintentional Injury Prevention conference.(v)Support public policy to prevent childhood unintentional injury.(vi)Conduct an annual survey of the county commissions created through Section 130140.1 of the Health and Safety Code to determine which of the county commissions elect to receive this funding, and to transmit that survey result to the state for distribution of the funding to the county commissions.(vii)Provide the State Department of Public Health childhood injury prevention branch with an annual report on actions carried out pursuant to this subparagraph.(2)The remaining 50 percent of the funds identified in this subdivision shall be used for child abuse prevention as follows:(A)Ninety percent of the moneys described in this paragraph shall be deposited in the county children’s trust fund, established pursuant to Section 18966 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the support of child abuse prevention services in the community.(B)Ten percent of the moneys described in this paragraph shall be deposited in the State Children’s Trust Fund, established pursuant to Section 18969, for public education, training, and technical assistance.(f)Moneys derived from civil penalties imposed on daycare facility providers shall be made available, upon appropriation, to the State Department of Social Services exclusively for the technical assistance, orientation, training, and education of child daycare facility providers.